Florida, session 2026, HB689.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (16) and (17) of section 381.986,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (17) and (18),
respectively, and a new subsection (16) is added to that
section, to read:
381.986 Medical use of marijuana.—
(16) IMMUNITY FROM CIVIL LIABILITY.—
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
1. "Adverse personnel action" means the refusal to hire a
job applicant; the discharge, suspension, transfer, or demotion
of an employee; or the withholding of bonuses, the reduction in
salary or benefits, or any other adverse action taken against an
employee or job applicant within the terms and conditions of
employment held or offered.
2. "Confirmed drug test," "drug test," "employee
assistance program," "job applicant," and "reasonable suspicion
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb689-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 689 2026
drug test" have the same meanings as in s. 112.0455(5).
(b) An employer who takes adverse personnel action against
an employee or job applicant based on such person's possession
or use of marijuana is immune from civil liability for such
action if:
1. The possession or use of marijuana occurs on a
workplace site;
2. The use of marijuana impairs an employee's ability to
perform his or her employment duties or responsibilities; or
3. The employee or job applicant refuses to test or tests
positive for marijuana with respect to any of the following
types of drug tests, as long as the requirements of s. 112.0455
or s. 440.102, as applicable, are met:
a. Job applicant testing, where an employer requires a job
applicant to submit to a drug test and uses a refusal to submit
to a drug test or a positive confirmed drug test as a basis for
refusing to hire the job applicant.
b. Reasonable suspicion testing, where an employer
requires an employee to submit to a reasonable suspicion drug
test.
c. Followup testing, where the employee in the course of
employment enters an employee assistance program for drug-
related problems or an alcohol and drug rehabilitation program,
and the employer requires the employee to submit to a drug test
as a followup to such program.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb689-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 689 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb689-01-c1